Utah statutes.
63M-1-2006.   Report to Workforce Services and Community and Economic
Development Interim Committee.
The board shall annually report to the Workforce Services and Community and
Economic Development Interim Committee on or before the November interim
meeting:
(1)  the total amount of grants and loans the board awarded to eligible
counties under this part during the fiscal year that ended on the June 30
immediately preceding the November interim meeting;
(2)  a description of the projects with respect to which the board awarded a
grant or loan under this part;
(3)  the total amount of outstanding debt service that is being repaid by a
grant or loan awarded under this part;
(4)  on whether the grants and loans awarded under this part have resulted in
economic development within project areas;
(5)  on whether the board recommends:
(a)  that the grants and loans authorized by this part should be continued; or
(b)  any modifications to this part; and
(6)  on any other issue relating to this part as determined by the Workforce
Services and Community and Economic Development Interim Committee.
